Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB269.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1947YC (1) 91 nls/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 554I.1 Commercial enterprises ââ 1 accepted forms of payment ââ cash. 2 1. A commercial enterprise transacting business in this 3 state from a physical location shall accept cash as a form of 4 payment, and shall not maintain a cash-free location. 5 2. A violation of this section shall result in the 6 revocation of a commercial enterpriseâs license to conduct 7 business in this state. 8 3. The department of insurance and financial services shall 9 adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section. 10